Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1604
University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources; accreditation; withhold.

The University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or its designated agency may withhold Nebraska SPF accreditation from any producer of SPF swine who is engaged in or attempting to engage in any dishonest practice for the purpose of evading the provisions of sections 54-1601 to 54-1605, including standards, rules, and regulations approved by the institute to cover accreditation.

Laws 1967, c. 338, § 4, p. 906;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 40.